North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-19 Reciprocity Agreements, Arrangements, or Declarations

39-19-01.
Director — Reciprocity powers.

The director may execute agreements, arrangements, or declarations involving the reciprocal use of the highways of this state by vehicles excepted in part or in full from registration requirements or mile tax payments in lieu thereof, or involving reciprocity between this state and any other state on matters relating to drivers’ licensing, financial responsibility, traffic law enforcement, vehicle sizes and weights, and vehicle inspection.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 283, § 1; 1965, ch. 280, § 1; 1967, ch. 316, § 1; 1969, ch. 355, § 1; 1971, ch. 382, § 1; 1983, ch. 418, § 13.

Cross-References.

Reciprocal agreements regarding registration of motor vehicles, see § 39-04-18.

Law Reviews.

“A Comparison of Drinking and Driving Law in Norway and North Dakota: More Than a Difference in Penalties,” 76 N.D. L. Rev. 33 (2000).

39-19-02.
Secretary to commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 382, § 3.

39-19-03.
Reciprocal use of highways.

No person may operate a vehicle upon the highways of this state unless the driver is licensed to operate a motor vehicle in this state or under a reciprocal agreement, arrangement, or declaration, has paid the mile tax in lieu of registration, or has complied with the requirements of a reciprocity agreement, arrangement, or declaration executed as provided in section 39-19-01.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 283, § 3; 1969, ch. 355, § 2; 1971, ch. 382, § 2.

39-19-04.
International registration plan — Multistate reciprocal agreement — Change of state agency.

The department, or the designated agency of the department acting directly or through the department, which has joined the international registration plan and multistate reciprocal agreement shall transfer such membership to the department. The department is authorized to expend the necessary fees required for membership. The provisions of the international registration plan, including any amendment to the plan, as agreed to by the department, are applicable to those vehicles engaged in interstate travel which are apportioned in North Dakota. The department may enforce and collect all penalties and fines allowed by the provisions of the international registration plan.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch 429, § 1; 1983, ch. 418, § 14; 1989, ch. 477, § 1.

39-19-05.
Agreements for joint operation of ports of entry.

The director may negotiate and enter into bilateral agreements with the appropriate officials of adjacent states, as provided herein:

The agreements may provide for the manning and operation of jointly occupied ports of entry, for the collection of highway user fees, registration fees, permit fees, fuel taxes, and any other fees and taxes which may be prescribed by law or rule.

The agreements may further provide for the collection of these fees and taxes by either party state at jointly occupied ports of entry before authorization is given for a vehicle to legally operate within that state or jurisdiction, and for the enforcement of safety, size and weight laws, and rules of the respective states.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 443, § 1.

39-19-06.
Unified carrier registration system.

The director may adopt all rules necessary to enable this state to participate in the unified carrier registration system. Any moneys derived from participation in the unified carrier registration program must be deposited in the highway fund.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 272, § 2; 2007, ch. 337, § 2; 2013, ch. 288, § 3.

39-19-06.1.
Single state insurance registration system. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 288, § 4.